Colorado statutes. TITLE 43 Transportation
PART 11
TRANSPORTATION PLANNING

43-1-1101. Legislative declaration.

The general assembly hereby finds and declares that local government involvement in transportation planning is critical to the overall statewide transportation planning process. The general assembly recognizes that regional planning commissions and transportation planning regions are the proper forum for transportation planning and that the county hearing process is the proper forum for local government input into the five-year program of projects. However, the general assembly also recognizes that state involvement in transportation planning, through the department of transportation, is equally critical to overall statewide planning, and the general assembly recognizes the department of transportation as the proper body, in cooperation with regional planning commissions and local government officials, for developing and maintaining the state transportation planning process and the state transportation plan.

Source:

L. 91:

Entire part added, p. 1042, § 2, effective July 1.

43-1-1102. Definitions.

For the purposes of this part 11, unless the context otherwise requires:

"Committee" means the transportation advisory committee created by section 43-1-1104.

"County hearing process" means the process of review of highway projects in counties performed by the department.

"Department" means the department of transportation.

(3.5) "Metropolitan area" means the area determined by agreement between a metropolitan planning organization and the governor pursuant to 23 U.S.C. sec. 134.

"Metropolitan planning organization" means a metropolitan planning organization under the "Federal Transit Act", codified at 49 U.S.C. sec. 5301 et seq.

"Regional planning commission" means a regional planning commission formed under the provisions of section 30-28-105, C.R.S.

"Regional transportation plan" means a technically based, long-range, future mobility needs assessment for any planning and management region.

"State plan" means the comprehensive statewide transportation plan formed by the commission pursuant to the provisions of section 43-1-1103 (5).

"Transportation planning region" means a region of the state as defined by the rule or regulation process required by section 43-1-1103 (5). The maximum number of such regions shall be fifteen unless such number is increased pursuant to paragraph (b) of this subsection (8).

Each metropolitan planning organization's metropolitan area shall, at a minimum, comprise a transportation planning region. If any new metropolitan planning organization is designated on or after January 1, 1998, the maximum allowable number of transportation planning regions under paragraph (a) of this subsection (8) shall be increased by one region for each such new metropolitan planning organization.

Source:

L. 91:

Entire part added, p. 1042, § 2, effective July 1.

L. 98:

(3.5) added and (7) amended, p. 462, § 1, effective April 21.

L. 2007:

(1) and (4) amended, p. 2050, § 101, effective June 1.

L. 2008:

(4) amended, p. 1917, § 141, effective August 5.

Editor's note:

Subsection (7) was originally numbered as subsection (8) and subsection (8) was originally numbered as subsection (7) in House Bill 91-1198, Session Laws of Colorado 1991, chapter 188, section 1, but those subsections were renumbered on revision in 1999 for proper placement.

43-1-1103. Transportation planning.

A twenty-year transportation plan shall be required for each transportation planning region that includes the metropolitan area of a metropolitan planning organization. Other transportation planning regions may, through intergovernmental agreements defined in section 30-28-105, C.R.S., prepare and submit such a transportation plan. A regional transportation plan shall include, but shall not be limited to, the following:

Identification of transportation facilities and services, including expansion or improvement of existing facilities and services, required to meet the estimated demand for transportation in the region over the twenty-year period;

Time schedules for completion of transportation projects which are included in the transportation plan;

Additional funding amount need and identification of anticipated funding sources;

Expected environmental, social, and economic impacts of the recommendations contained in the transportation plan, including an objective evaluation of the full range of reasonable transportation alternatives, including traffic system management options, travel demand management strategies and other transportation modes, as well as improvements to the existing facilities and new facilities, in order to provide for the transportation and environmental needs of the area in a safe and efficient manner; and

Shall assist other agencies in developing transportation control measures for utilization in accordance with state and federal statutes or regulations, and the state implementation plan, and shall identify and evaluate measures that show promise of supporting clean air objectives.

A regional transportation plan shall state the fiscal need to maintain mobility and what can be reasonably expected to be implemented with the estimated revenues which are likely to be available.

Any regional planning commissions formed for the purpose of conducting regional transportation planning or any transportation planning region shall be responsible, in cooperation with the state and other governmental agencies, for carrying out necessary continuing, cooperative, and comprehensive transportation planning for the region represented by such commission and for the purpose of meeting the requirements of subsection (4) of this section.

In the absence of a locally generated regional transportation plan by a duly formed regional planning commission, the department shall include these areas in the statewide transportation plan and shall be responsible for the appropriate level of planning and analysis to incorporate the needs and recommendations of the region in an equitable and consistent manner with other regions of the state.

The regional transportation plan for any region may recommend the priority for any transportation improvements planned for such region. The commission shall consider the priorities contained in such plan in making decisions concerning transportation improvements.

The department shall integrate and consolidate the regional transportation plans for the transportation planning regions into a comprehensive statewide transportation plan. The formation of the state plan shall be accomplished through a statewide planning process set by rules and regulations promulgated by the commission. The state plan shall address but shall not be limited to the following factors:

An emphasis on multi-modal transportation considerations, including the connectivity between modes of transportation;

An emphasis on coordination with county and municipal land use planning, including examination of the impact of land use decisions on transportation needs and the exploration of opportunities for preservation of transportation corridors;

Coordination with federal military installations in the state to identify the transportation infrastructure needs of the installations and ensure that those needs are given full consideration during the formation of the state plan.

The development of areawide multi-modal management plans in coordination with the process of developing the elements of the state plan;

The targeting of infrastructure investments, including preservation of the existing transportation system commonly known as "fixing it first" to support the economic vitality of the state and region;

Safety enhancement;

Strategic mobility and multimodal choice;

The support of urban or rural mass transit;

Environmental stewardship;

Effective, efficient, and safe freight transport; and

Reduction of greenhouse gas emissions.

Repealed.

Source:

L. 91:

Entire part added, p. 1043, § 2, effective July 1.

L. 94:

(6) added, p. 1820, § 8, effective June 1.

L. 97:

(6) repealed, p. 161, § 3, effective March 28.

L. 98:

IP(1) amended, p. 463, § 2, effective April 21.

L. 2009:

IP(5) amended and (5)(d), (5)(e), (5)(f), (5)(g), (5)(h), (5)(i), and (5)(j) added, (SB 09-108), ch. 5, p. 54, § 15, effective March 2.

L. 2016:

IP(5) amended and (5)(b.5) added, (HB 16-1061), ch. 57, p. 138, § 2, effective August 10.

Cross references:

For the legislative declaration in HB 16-1061, see section 1 of chapter 57, Session Laws of Colorado 2016.

43-1-1104. Transportation advisory committee.

A transportation advisory committee is hereby created. The committee is composed of one representative from each transportation planning region, one representative of the Southern Ute tribe chosen by the Southern Ute Indian tribal council, and one representative of the Ute Mountain Ute tribe chosen by the Ute Mountain Ute tribal council. If a regional planning commission has been formed in a transportation planning region, the chairman of such commission or the chairman's designee shall be the representative for the region on the committee. If any transportation planning region has not formed a regional planning commission, then the representative shall be chosen by the boards of county commissioners of the counties contained in such region in consultation with officials of the municipalities contained in such region.

No later than three months after May 20, 2009, the executive director, in consultation with the commission, shall appoint a special interim transit and rail advisory committee to specifically advise the commission and the executive director regarding the initial focus of the transit and rail division created in section 43-1-117.5 and to recommend a long-term advisory structure, including the advisory structure's purpose and role, in support of the transit and rail-related functions of the department. The special interim transit and rail advisory committee shall include such representatives of industries and other groups interested in transit and rail issues and such other individuals as the executive director, in consultation with the commission, deems appropriate; except that the committee shall include, at a minimum, one or more:

Representatives of transit operators;

Representatives of class I railroads;

Representatives of short line railroads; and

Representatives of entities or interest groups involved in the promotion, planning, or development of passenger rail systems.

The committee shall provide advice to both the department and the commission on the needs of the transportation systems in Colorado, including but not limited to budgets, transportation improvement programs, the statewide transportation improvement program, transportation plans, and state transportation policies, and shall review and provide comment to both the department and the commission on all regional transportation plans submitted for the transportation planning regions. The activities of the committee shall not be construed to constrain or replace the county hearing process.

Source:

L. 91:

Entire part added, p. 1044, § 2, effective July 1.

L. 2009:

(1) amended, (SB 09-094), ch. 280, p. 1251, § 4, effective May 20; (1) amended, (SB 09-292), ch. 369, p. 1985, § 129, effective August 5.

L. 2016:

(1)(a) amended, (HB 16-1169), ch. 95, p. 272, § 2, effective August 10; (2) amended, (HB 16-1018), ch. 2, p. 3, § 1, effective August 10.

Editor's note:

Amendments to subsection (1) by Senate Bill 09-094 and Senate Bill 09-292 were harmonized.

Cross references:

For the legislative declaration in HB 16-1169, see section 1 of chapter 95, Session Laws of Colorado 2016.

43-1-1105. Metropolitan planning commissions.

The provisions of this part 11 shall not be construed to replace or interfere with the duties of metropolitan planning organizations.

Source:

L. 91:

Entire part added, p. 1045, § 2, effective July 1.

L. 2007:

Entire section amended, p. 2050, § 102, effective June 1.